Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF419.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [144.1915] OCCUPATIONAL MEDICINE RESIDENCY GRANT PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of health. new text end new text begin (c) "Occupational medicine residency program" means a program that: new text end new text begin (1) is located in Minnesota; new text end new text begin (2) is accredited as an occupational medicine residency program or is a candidate for accreditation; and new text end new text begin (3) trains medical residents in the specialty of occupational medicine. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Program administration. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must award occupational medicine residency grants to existing, eligible, not-for-profit occupational medicine residency programs to support existing and new residency positions. Funds must be allocated first to proposed new residency positions for occupational medicine, and remaining funds must be allocated proportionally based on the number of existing residents in eligible programs. The commissioner may fund a new residency position for up to three years. new text end new text begin (b) Grant funds awarded under this section may only be spent to cover the costs of: new text end new text begin (1) establishing, maintaining, or expanding training for occupational medicine residents; new text end new text begin (2) recruitment, training, and retention of occupational medicine residents and faculty; new text end new text begin (3) travel and lodging for occupational medicine residents; new text end new text begin (4) salaries for occupational medicine faculty, residents, and preceptors; and new text end new text begin (5) training site improvements, fees, equipment, and supplies required for new residency positions for occupational medicine residents. new text end new text begin (c) Grant funds must not be used to supplant any other government or private funds available for these purposes. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Applications. new text end new text begin Eligible occupational medicine residency programs seeking a grant under this section must submit an application to the commissioner. The application must include objectives, a related work plan and budget, a description of the number of new and existing residency positions that will be supported using grant funds, and any additional information the commissioner determines to be necessary. The commissioner must determine whether applications are complete and responsive and may require revisions or additional information before awarding a grant. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Program oversight. new text end new text begin The commissioner must require and collect from occupational medicine residency programs receiving grants information necessary to administer and evaluate the program. The evaluation must include the scope of expansion of new residency positions and information describing specific programs to enhance existing residency positions, which may include facility improvements. The commissioner must collect data on occupational medicine residency shortages. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for the occupational medicine residency grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 144.1915. The commissioner may use up to $....... of this appropriation for program administration. new text end